Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 8. Assets of Retirement System.

§ 51.1-147.
Members’ contribution account.

All members’ contributions and interest allowances shall be credited to the member’s contribution account. Accumulated contributions required to be returned to a member or required to be paid in the event of a member’s death before retirement shall be paid from the member’s contribution account.

At the end of each payroll period, the Comptroller shall transfer to the members’ contribution account an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the deductions which would have been made for the preceding payroll period from the salaries of all members from the appropriate fund in the state treasury. The Comptroller shall forward a record of all such transfers to the Board. In all other cases, the employer shall transmit its warrant to the State Treasurer for the payment of an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the deductions made for each payroll period from the salaries of all members paid by the employer for the preceding payroll period. The funds collected by the State Treasurer shall be credited to the members’ contribution account. The State Treasurer shall transmit a record of all moneys collected to the Comptroller and the Board.

Each individual account of the members’ contribution account shall be credited annually with interest at the rate of four percent annually on the accumulated contributions of the member. Interest shall accrue on any contribution beginning at the end of the fiscal year in which the contribution was made. The Board shall have the authority to determine the manner in which the interest is to be credited to the members’ contribution account.

Upon the retirement of a member, his accumulated contributions shall be transferred from the members’ contribution account to the retirement allowance account.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.49; 1966, c. 174; 1970, c. 476; 1976, c. 540; 1982, c. 467; 1986, c. 474; 1990, c. 832.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1998, c. 746, cl. 2, effective April 16, 1998, provides: “That any active member of the General Assembly who is receiving a retirement allowance while in service as a member of the General Assembly based solely on such member’s service as a member of the General Assembly, as permitted by subsection B of §

51.1-155

as it existed prior to the effective date of this act [April 16, 1998], combined with any purchased service as permitted in §§

51.1-142

and

51.1-143

, shall be prospectively unretired and placed in active duty status as provided for other state employees generally pursuant to Title 51.1 of the Code of Virginia. However, any such member, at his option, may be retroactively unretired by repaying any such sums he may have received, with interest thereon at the rate set forth in subsection C of §

51.1-147

. Any such member who purchased service as permitted in §§

51.1-142

and

51.1-143

shall be provided an opportunity to rescind such purchase of service and request a refund of any such purchased service.”

§ 51.1-148.
Retirement allowance account.

All employer contributions, all amounts transferred from the members’ contribution account, and all income from the invested assets of the retirement system shall be credited to the retirement allowance account. All benefits under the retirement system, other than refunds of members’ accumulated contributions, and all administrative expenses of the retirement system, except to the extent that such expenses are otherwise paid, shall be paid from the retirement allowance account. At the discretion of the Board, contributions, penalties, and interest assessments may be deducted from the retirement allowance account of the employer.

The amount of the interest allowances provided for in this chapter shall be transferred from the retirement allowance account to the members’ contribution account annually.

The records of the retirement allowance account shall be maintained so that the portion that is applicable to each respective employer may be ascertained at all times.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.50; 1956, c. 560; 1978, c. 841; 1980, c. 137; 1984, c. 430; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-149.
Appointment of custodian; payments.

The Board is authorized to appoint custodians for the safekeeping and payment of retirement system assets.
The selection of these investment services shall be governed exclusively by the fiduciary standard set forth in this chapter.

The Board may request the State Treasurer to issue retirement benefit payments on behalf of the retirement system.
At the direction of the Board, retirement payments from the accounts shall be made by the State Treasurer, on warrants of the Comptroller, issued upon vouchers signed by persons designated by the Board.
A duly attested copy of a resolution of the Board designating the persons and bearing on its face the specimen signatures of the persons shall be filed with the Comptroller as his authority for issuing warrants upon such vouchers.
No voucher shall be drawn unless it has been authorized by Board resolution.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.51; 1988, c. 809; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-150.
Deposits.

For the purpose of meeting disbursements for retirement allowances and other payments, cash, not exceeding ten percent of the total amount in the accounts of the retirement system, may be kept on deposit to the credit of the State Treasurer in one or more banks or trust companies, located in Virginia, organized under the laws of Virginia or of the United States and qualified as state depositories.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.52; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-151.
Repealed by Acts 1997, c. 641.